District of Columbia statutes.
34-707

Destruction of apparatus or appliance of Commission.

Any person who shall destroy, injure, or interfere with any apparatus or appliance owned or operated by or in charge of the Commission or its agent shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by fine not exceeding $100 or imprisonment for a period not exceeding 30 days, or both.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 992, ch. 150, § 8, par. 86

History

1981 Ed., § 43-309.
1973 Ed., § 43-909.

Prior Codifications